Mississippi statutes. Title 47. Prisons and Prisoners; Probation and Parole
Chapter 1. County and Municipal Prisons and Prisoners

§ 47-1-1.
Enforcement of sentences.

Every convict sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail, or to such imprisonment and the payment of a fine, or the payment of a fine, shall be committed to jail, and shall remain in close confinement for the full time specified for imprisonment in the sentence of the court, and in like confinement, subject to the provisions of Section 99-19-20.1, until the fine, costs and jail fees be fully paid, unless discharged in due course of law, or as hereinafter provided. Subject to the provisions of Section 99-19-20.1, no convict shall be held in continuous confinement under a conviction for any one (1) offense for failure to pay fine and costs in such case for a period of more than one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 775; 1906, § 837; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4015, 4030; 1930, § 4058; 1942, § 7899; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 2018, ch. 416, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 47-1-3.
County convicts; duty of board of supervisors.

It is the imperative duty of the board of supervisors in each county in this state to require each convict sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail and the payment of a fine and costs, or to imprisonment and payment of costs, or to payment of fine and costs, to work out the sentence on the county convict farm or on the public roads or other public works of the county, or in a contiguous county, as herein provided. But any convict who is sentenced to the payment of a fine and costs and who pays such fine and costs shall thereby be relieved from working out such fine and costs, but the payment in full of such fine and costs shall not relieve such convict from working out the full time of his imprisonment as adjudged in his sentence. The board of supervisors of any county, however, may by an order spread upon its minutes, giving the reason therefor, and with the approval of the circuit judge of the district, discharge any aged or infirm convict upon his making an affidavit of his insolvency and inability to pay the fine and costs, and filing same with the clerk of the board of supervisors at any time after the expiration of his imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 814; 1906, § 870; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4030; 1930, § 4059; 1942, § 7900; Laws, 1900, ch. 100; Laws, 1906, ch. 100; Laws, 1908, ch. 168; Laws, 1936, ch. 269.

§ 47-1-5.
County convicts; board of supervisors may lease or buy suitable lands.

In order to carry out the provisions of Section 47-1-3, the board of supervisors of each county in this state are authorized and directed, whenever it may be necessary to buy or lease a sufficient number of acres of land within reasonable and convenient distance of the county jail to be used by the county as a county convict farm. They are also authorized to make any necessary improvements thereon, such as erecting necessary and convenient buildings, clearing, terracing and ditching and leveeing, or otherwise repairing and improving such farm, so that it may be suitable to be used as a farm upon which to work the convicts committed to the county jail, and they shall employ a competent and suitable person to be known as foreman of county farm to superintend such convict farm and manage it and to work the convicts sentenced to the county jail thereon. The board of supervisors in each county shall also have full and complete authority to buy, or rent necessary mules or horses, tractors, farming tools and implements and all other necessary things incidental to the successful operation of such convict farm in such numbers and amounts as they may reasonably contemplate will be necessary to successfully operate such farm, having in view, first, the continuous employment of all the convicts able to work thereon at remunerative labor, and second, the operation of said farm in the most economical manner consistent with the continuous working of such convicts.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 814; 1906, § 870; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4030; 1930, § 4060; 1942, § 7901; Laws, 1900, ch. 100; Laws, 1906, ch. 100; Laws, 1908, ch. 168.

§ 47-1-7.
Boards of supervisors of contiguous counties may own farm jointly; working prisoners in another county.

In any county where there are not a sufficient number of convicts to make it economically feasible for such county to own and operate a county convict farm as provided for by law, the board of supervisors of any such county may agree with the board of supervisors of any contiguous county to own and operate in common with such contiguous county, a county convict farm upon which prisoners of both such counties may be detained and required to work. In like manner the board of supervisors of any county in which there are not a sufficient number of convicts to make it economically feasible to own and operate a county convict farm, may make similar arrangements with any city, town or village within said county to own and operate said farm in connection with said city, town or village. In any county where there are not a sufficient number of convicts to make it economically feasible for such county to own a farm or to own and operate a farm with a contiguous county or with a city or town, the board of supervisors of such county may contract with the board of supervisors of any contiguous county or with any county in the same circuit or chancery court district, to have its prisoners worked by the contiguous county or counties in the same circuit or chancery court district upon payment made to the board of supervisors of such contiguous county or counties in the same circuit or chancery court district for the purpose of detaining and working such prisoners. The terms of such a contract are to be agreed upon by and between the two contracting boards and the same shall not be in violation of the law. Where the board of supervisors of one county so contracts to work convicts of another county, all the provisions of Sections 47-1-1 through 47-1-37, Sections 47-1-41, 47-1-45, 47-1-47, and 47-1-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, and Section 226 of the Constitution in regard to the working of convicts shall apply to the convicts contracted for as herein provided; and the name of the convict or convicts may be entered on the jail docket of the county contracting to detain and work the convict or convicts, together with all other information required by Section 47-1-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 4038; 1930, § 4062; 1942, § 7903; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1936, ch. 269; Laws, 1960, ch. 283.

§ 47-1-9.
Convicts may be worked on public roads or other county public works.

In any county where it is clearly more advantageous to the county to work the county convicts or some of them on the public roads of the county, or on other works of the county exclusively public in their character, the board of supervisors shall have the authority so to order, and in such cases the board shall establish all proper regulations for the working, guarding, safekeeping, clothing, housing and subsistence of convicts while so working, and shall provide all the necessary equipment for such purpose. The board shall establish regulations for the discipline of convicts on said works, and on county farms, when a convict is persistently idle or refractory, and may enforce such regulations by penalties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 784; 1906, § 843; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4018; 1930, § 4063; 1942, § 7904; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-11.
Convicts physically unable shall not be required to work.

If any convict committed to the county jail is physically unable to do any kind of manual labor, then, upon the certificate of the county health officer or physician designated by the board of supervisors of the county, to this effect, such convict shall not be required, during the period of such physical disability, to perform manual labor on the convict farm. But all convicts shall be required each day to do and perform such work as they are physically able to do and perform and which will not impair the health of such convict, or as is not inhumane to require of him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4064; 1942, § 7905; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-13.
By contract county may work under guard certain prisoners before indictment and conviction.

Any person being held in the county jail in default of bail to await trial, except those held for treason, murder, arson, or rape, and except such as the sheriff may deem it improper to let out, may on application to the sheriff of the county, be allowed to work on the county farm or on the public roads or other county public works as other convicts are worked and at the same wage. The board of supervisors shall settle with prisoners so working at their regular meetings monthly. But if it appears that it is not to the best interest of the county to work such prisoners, the board may decline at any time to employ them.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 808; 1906, § 864; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4040; 1930, § 4068; 1942, § 7909.

§ 47-1-15.
Deductions from sentence for efficient work.

Any convict working under the direction of the board of supervisors who renders efficient services and complies with all necessary rules and regulations may have deducted from the term of his imprisonment one-fourth (1/4) thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 783; 1906, § 842; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4017; 1930, § 4066; 1942, § 7907; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1932, ch. 199.

§ 47-1-17.
When convict not credited with wages.

No convict shall be credited with any wages during the time of his or her escape; and if any convict escapes while being worked on a public road, or works or county farm, he or she may be pursued and retaken by any person, or officer authorized to make arrests, or board, or any one entitled to the custody or services of said convict; and when retaken such convict shall be required to work out the balance of his term of hire, not counting the period of such escape, even if the term of imprisonment and the time for which such convict was first hired had expired before the recapture. Such convict shall be liable to indictment for such escape and liable to the same punishment as for an escape from the custody of the county jail.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 873; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4032; 1930, § 4067; 1942, § 7908; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1932, ch. 246.

§ 47-1-19.
Leasing or hiring convicts unlawful; lawful public service work.

It is unlawful for any county-housed state inmate or county prisoner or prisoners to be leased or hired to any individual or corporation for any purpose whatsoever. Nor shall they be worked under any contractor; but in working them on county farms, or on the public roads or on any other work, which work must be of an exclusively public character, they shall be under exclusive official control and management.

It is lawful for a state, county or municipality to provide prisoners for public service work for nonprofit charitable organizations as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code if that nonprofit charitable organization provides food to charities. In addition, it is lawful for a state, county or municipality to provide prisoners for public service work for churches according to criteria approved by the Department of Corrections.

The prisoners participating in the public service work under paragraph (a) shall remain under the exclusive control and management of the county or municipality.

A prisoner performing public service work under this subsection shall be entitled to earned credits as provided under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4014, 4016; 1930, § 4057; 1942, § 7898; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1997, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 364, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 47-1-21.
Sheriff to keep a jail docket; what to contain.

The sheriff of each county shall keep a well bound alphabetical jail docket. In it he shall promptly enter under the proper initial the name, age, color and sex of each convict, the date of his or her commitment, each day worked on the county farm, time required to be served and amount of fine and costs and the jail fees charged against the prisoner and the date of discharge.

The sheriff shall submit his docket to the board of supervisors at each of their regular meetings, and the same shall be examined carefully by the president of the board, and by any other members who desire to examine the same, in the presence of the board while in session.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 800; 1906, § 858; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4024; 1930, § 4071; 1942, § 7912; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-23.
The sexes to be kept separate.

It shall be unlawful for convicts of different sexes to be confined or worked together.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art. 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6, art. 131; 1871, § 237; 1880, § 3152; 1892, § 789; 1906, § 874; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4033, 4034; 1930, § 4072; 1942, § 7913; Laws, 1908, chs. 109, 169; Laws, 1968, ch. 552, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1968).

§ 47-1-25.
Officers to have access to convicts.

Each county officer or officers, for any district of a county shall at all times have free access to convicts in the custody of any official for the purpose of investigating their condition and treatment. The sheriff or his deputies shall visit the convict camp or county farms where the convicts of his county are kept or worked at least once in every month and more often if necessary. He shall make a thorough inspection and investigation of the treatment of convicts and report the same in writing to the board of supervisors. For failure to perform duty in this respect the board of supervisors may fine the sheriff Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 799; 1906, § 857; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4023; 1930, § 4073; 1942, § 7914; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-27.
Maltreatment forbidden.

An official, or guard, or other employee, having the custody of any county prisoner, or any official or employee of the county having custody of any county prisoner, who shall maltreat or abuse any such convict, or who shall knowingly permit the same to be done, or who being under duty to provide sufficient and wholesome food, clothing, shelter, bathing facilities, or medical attention to such convict, shall wilfully fail to furnish the same to such convict, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than Ten Dollars ($10.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or shall be imprisoned not less than one (1) month, or shall suffer both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court, and it shall be the duty of the judge of the circuit court of such county to so charge the grand jury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 877; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4035; 1930, § 4074; 1942, § 7915; Laws, 1896, ch. 88; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-29.
Complaint of convicts investigated.

On complaint by or on behalf of any convict to any county or county district officer, that such convict had been improperly treated in any respect, it shall be the duty of such officer at once to investigate the complaint, and if it is believed to be well founded, to report the facts to the president of the board of supervisors, or to the board in session. Upon such report the board shall cite the person complained of to appear before it, and such action shall be taken by the board as shall be proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3180; 1892, § 798; 1906, § 856; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4022; 1930, § 4075; 1942, § 7916: Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-31.
Grand jury to examine records and treatment of prisoners.

Each grand jury which is impaneled shall examine the records of county prisoners and their treatment and condition and report the same to the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 871; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4031; 1930, § 4076; 1942, § 7917; Laws, 1896, ch. 133; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1983, ch. 499, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 47-1-33.
Each convict to have evidence of term of sentence and amount of fine.

The sheriff on receiving each convict shall furnish such convict with a certificate showing the amount of the fine and costs, as far as the costs are then known, the beginning and length of his term of imprisonment. The convict shall be allowed to have and keep such certificate on or about his person, if he so desires.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 806; 1906, § 862; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4027; 1930, § 4077; 1942, § 7918; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-35.
County farms operating at loss, disposition of.

The board of supervisors of any county that now maintains and operates a county penal farm, commonly known as a “county farm,” which farm contains more than five hundred (500) acres and less than six hundred (600) acres of land, which said farm has been continuously operating at a loss to the county for a period of five (5) years or more, and provided said county contains at least four hundred (400) square miles of territory and less than four hundred twenty-five (425) square miles of territory within its boundaries, shall sell, at public sale after receiving bids as required by law for the letting of public contracts, to the highest and best bidder for cash, said county farm; provided, however, that the said board shall retain for the benefit of the county and shall reserve from said sale, at least one-half (1/2) of the mineral rights and interests in said lands, with full right in the said board, in its discretion, to lease said retained and reserved mineral interests and rights, to the highest and best bidder after receiving bids therefor in the same manner, at the same or any other time.

Any and all amounts received from such sale of said lands and from such lease of said mineral interests or rights, shall be, on receipt by the board, applied to the payment of the bonded indebtedness of said county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7901-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 312, §§ 1, 2, eff December 31, 1946.

§ 47-1-37.
Board of supervisors may hire additional labor to work on county farm.

In the cultivation of crops and the gathering thereof if it shall appear necessary, from the lack of convict labor, the board of supervisors may employ free labor at current prices to work on a county convict farm until such time as the convict labor may become sufficient to complete and gather the crops started on such a farm, and pay for the same out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 878; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4036; 1930, § 4061; 1942, § 7902; Laws, 1902, ch. 64; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-39.
Municipal prison and prisoners; municipality to pay expenses of jail officer education courses.

The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to construct and maintain a municipal prison, and to regulate the keeping of the same and the prisoners therein, and to contract with the board of supervisors, which is empowered in the premises, for the use of the county jail by the municipality; and to provide for the working of the streets by municipal prisoners, and to contract with the county for such work by county prisoners or the working of county roads by municipal prisoners, or for working same on the county farms. Municipal prisoners shall be worked on county roads or county farms only in the county in which the municipality is situated. Males and females shall be confined in separate cells or compartments.

The municipality shall pay the tuition, living and travel expenses incurred by a person attending and participating in the basic and continuing education courses for jail officers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2954; 1906, § 3345; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5842; 1930, § 2421; 1942, § 3374-135; Laws, 1950, ch. 491, § 135; Laws, 1964, ch. 543; Laws, 1968, ch. 552, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 319, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 515, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 47-1-41.
Working of municipal prisoners.

Any person convicted of violating any ordinance of any city, town or village in this state and sentenced to pay a fine and costs therefor, and failing to do so, may be worked on the streets or other public works of the municipality in the custody of the street commissioner, or other person designated by the mayor and board of aldermen, or councilmen of such municipality and at its expense, and shall receive credit on such fine and costs as provided in Section 99-19-20 for each day so worked, and such municipality shall accord the same treatment to its convicts that is required by this chapter to county convicts. The responsibility of carrying out the provisions of this section shall devolve on the mayor and board of aldermen or board of councilmen of each municipality with reference to its convicts. In the event it is, in the judgment of the ruling authorities of any village in the state or of any small town in the state, unprofitable to work the convicts as above provided, then such village or town may contract with the board of supervisors of the county at the best price and take and work such convicts on the county farm, but the convict shall receive credit at the rate provided in Section 99-19-20 for each day worked.

If a convict is unable to work or if the city, town or village is unable to provide work for the convict, the convict shall receive the credit provided in Section 99-19-20 for each day of confinement.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3185; 1892, § 813; 1906, § 869; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4029; 1930, § 4069; 1942, § 7910; Laws, 1918, ch. 154; Laws, 2010, ch. 492, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 7, 2010.).

§ 47-1-43.
Keeping of county offenders in municipal jails pending trial.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality located within such county are hereby authorized to enter into agreements providing for the keeping of persons arrested for offenses committed within the county in which such municipality is located in the jail facilities of such municipality pending trial of such person. Such agreements may provide for the payment to the municipality by the board of supervisors from any available funds of the county of a sum not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for each day or part thereof during which an offender may be confined in the jail of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3374-135.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 288, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1968).

§ 47-1-45.
Board of supervisors may agree with municipalities of the county on terms of working municipal convicts.

The board of supervisors of each county is authorized to make contract with any village or small town within the county to work its convicts on the county farm. But in agreeing to take and work such convicts the board of supervisors shall not agree to pay more per day for the labor of any municipal convict than in its judgment the labor of such convict is worth to the county, in order that in the working of such municipal convicts the county shall not do so at a loss to the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 3185; 1892, § 813; 1906, § 869; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4029; 1930, § 4070; 1942, § 7911; Laws, 1918, ch. 154.

§ 47-1-47.
Credit allowed for labor of convicts; treatment.

Every county or municipal convict shall be comfortably clothed at the expense of the county or municipality, but all clothing furnished shall remain the property of the county or municipality, and shall be thoroughly fumigated and disinfected before being allotted to a convict after having been used by another, and every convict shall be sufficiently fed, to maintain his body and induce his good health, with substantial and suitable food to be furnished and prepared and paid for by the county or municipality. Every convict, for each day’s work he is required to do, shall receive credit on his fine and costs assessed against him at the rate provided under Section 99-19-20, until such fine and costs are fully paid. In case the convict is serving a sentence of imprisonment, each day that he works in serving such sentence shall entitle him credit for equal time on his sentence of imprisonment, but in no instance shall a convict receive credit on the fine and costs and on the time sentenced to imprisonment for the same work. No convict shall be allowed to labor more than eight (8) hours per day, but shall be required, when able, to perform eight (8) hours labor each day.

If a convict is unable to work or if the county or the municipality is unable to provide work for the convict, the convict shall receive the credit provided in Section 99-19-20 for each day of imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 786; 1906, § 845; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4020; 1930, § 4065; 1942, § 7906; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; Laws, 1954, ch. 243; Laws, 1979, ch. 501, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 492, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 7, 2010.).

§ 47-1-49.
Control over jails owned jointly by municipalities and counties.

In the case of a jail owned jointly by a county and municipality, under the provisions of Section 17-5-1, the governing authorities of the county and municipality are hereby vested with full and complete authority, jurisdiction and control over such jointly owned jail facility and the governing authority of the municipality may appoint a jailer who shall be responsible for all municipal prisoners lodged in said jail in the same manner in which the sheriff is responsible for state prisoners, and such jailer shall have the same right of access to the jail as the sheriff.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 136; 1871, § 242; 1880, § 342; 1892, § 4132; 1906, § 4684; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3101; 1930, § 3331; 1942, § 4256; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).

§ 47-1-51.
Jointly owned jails; jail supplies.

The jailer of a jail jointly owned by a county and a municipality shall, in regard to municipal prisoners, provide daily wholesome and sufficient food and drink, fire and lights when necessary and proper, and sufficient and clean bedding for all such prisoners committed to the jail, either before or after conviction. Any prisoner may, if he thinks fit, supply himself with meat and drink and bedding, but the same shall pass through the hands of the jailer to the prisoner.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art. 3 (15); 1857, ch. 6, art. 131; 1871, § 237; 1880, § 343; 1892, § 4136; 1906, § 4687; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3104; 1930, § 3334; 1942, § 4259; Laws, 1896, p. 153; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 552, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 29, 1968).

§ 47-1-53.
[Reserved].

In the case of a jail jointly owned by a county and a municipality, the circuit judge in the district in which such jail is located, upon the request and recommendation of either the sheriff of the county or the marshal or chief of police of the municipality involved in the joint ownership, may authorize additional jail guards in cases of emergency and the cost thereof shall be paid in equal proportions by the county and municipality involved.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinsons’s 1848, ch. 28, art. 6(31); 1857, ch. 6, art. 135; 1871, § 241; 1880, § 344; 1892, § 4138; 1906, § 4689; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3106; 1930, § 3336; 1942, § 4261; Laws, 1966, ch. 369, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).

§ 47-1-57.
Furnishing of medical aid to prisoners; nurse screening for county prisoner for nonemergency medical complaints.

When any person confined in jail shall be in need of medical or surgical aid, the sheriff shall immediately examine the condition of such prisoner and, if he is of the opinion that the prisoner needs such aid, he shall call in a nurse or physician to attend him. If the prisoner be unable to pay the cost, the account of the nurse or physician, when allowed and certified as required in respect to accounts of sheriffs for keeping prisoners, shall be paid, in like manner, out of the treasury of the county in which a prisoner is charged with the crime for which he is imprisoned. The board of supervisors may contract with a physician for the jail by the year.

The board of supervisors of any county may authorize the sheriff to establish a program under which prisoners expressing the need for non-emergency medical attention will have access to a registered nurse who will evaluate their condition and determine the necessity for treatment by a physician. Charges for such a visit with a registered nurse shall be paid by the prisoner by deductions made by the sheriff out of any funds of the prisoner held by the sheriff or in any other manner satisfactory to the sheriff; however, such prisoner shall not be required to pay out of funds of the prisoner held by the sheriff, more than Ten Dollars ($10.00) per visit. If the prisoner is unable to pay the cost, the cost shall be paid out of the county treasury in the same manner as provided for payment of other medical costs in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 28, art. 8; 1857, ch. 6, art. 132; 1871, § 238; 1880, § 345; 1892, § 4139; 1906, § 4690; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3107; 1930, § 3337; 1942, § 4262; Laws, 1940, ch. 262; Laws, 1956, ch. 194; Laws, 1994, ch. 642, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 47-1-59.
Hospitalization of prisoners; expenses.

When the sheriff, marshal or any other peace officer of this state has in his lawful custody a prisoner who, through accident, injury or illness, is in need of hospitalization, such officer may take such prisoner to the nearest hospital in the county or if there be no hospital in that county, to the nearest hospital in an adjacent county and if upon arrival at such hospital any physician licensed to practice medicine in this state certifies that in his opinion such prisoner is in need of hospitalization, such prisoner shall be hospitalized in such hospital for as long as in the opinion of such physician it is necessary to so hospitalize such prisoner. If, in the opinion of the sheriff or other peace officer having custody of such prisoner at the time he is delivered to the aforesaid hospital, or in the opinion of the director of the university hospital if the prisoner be brought to that institution, it is necessary that he be placed under guard while a patient at such hospital, the sheriff of the county in which the crime he was placed in custody for committing was alleged to have taken place, shall furnish the aforesaid guard. When the aforesaid physician or other reputable physician shall certify that hospitalization no longer is needed, the prisoner shall be returned to the original place of detention.

The actual expense of guarding the prisoner in the hospital shall be paid out of the general funds of the county where the prisoner was originally confined or arrested. The expense contracted incident to the hospitalization aforesaid shall be paid by the prisoner; otherwise he may be hospitalized as a state aid patient. However, if the prisoner is ineligible for state aid or the amount available for hospitalization as a state aid patient is inadequate to pay all such hospital expense of a prisoner who is financially unable to pay his own expenses, the board of supervisors of the county where the prisoner was originally confined or arrested shall, upon presentation of the certificate of the physician certifying that said prisoner was in need of hospitalization, pay from the general funds of the county the reasonable and customary charges for such services or as much thereof as is not paid by state aid. Any such payment to a hospital shall be discretionary with the board of supervisors if its county supports the hospital involved by a special tax levy for its operation and maintenance.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4262.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 245, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1956, ch. 310; Laws, 1964, ch. 369, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 23, 1971).

§ 47-1-61.
Penalty for failure to discharge convict.

Any sheriff or other person having lawful custody of any convict who shall fail to discharge such convict when he shall have served the full time of his sentence and fully paid his fine and the costs charged against him, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished accordingly.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 807; 1906, § 863; Hemingway’s 1917, § 4028; 1930, § 4078; 1942, § 7919; Laws, 1908, ch. 109.

§ 47-1-63.
Residency of prisoner as affected by incarceration in facility of Department of Corrections.

No person shall be deemed to be a resident of a county solely because of being incarcerated in a facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections that is located in such county.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 440, § 3, eff from and after May 1, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the addition of this section).

§ 47-1-55.
Jointly owned jails; guards.